Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0845.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 18506. An individual who is granted a limited license under section 18509(2) 18509(3) to engage in the 2-year postdegree experience in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level or practice of social work at the master's level shall practice under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker and confine his or her the individual's practice to an agency, a health facility, an institution, or another entity approved by the board. Sec. 18509. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section sections 18509a and 18515, an individual granted a license under this part shall meet the following requirements: (a) A licensed bachelor's social worker shall have meet all of the following: (i) Have been awarded a bachelor's degree in social work from a an accredited college or university social work program approved by the board. and shall have (ii) Have completed at least 2 years of full-time postbachelor's degree experience, or the equivalent in part-time hours, in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. Until July 1, 2008, the required experience in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level shall be performed under the supervision of a person who has been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in social work from a college or university school of social work. (iii) Have passed an examination approved by the board. (b) A licensed master's social worker shall have meet all of the following: (i) Have been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in the field of social work from a an accredited college or university social work program approved by the board. and shall have (ii) Have completed at least 2 years of full-time postmaster's or postdoctoral degree experience, or the equivalent in part-time hours, in the practice of social work at the master's level under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. Until July 1, 2008, the required experience in the practice of social work at the master's level shall be performed under the supervision of a person who has been awarded a master's or doctoral degree in the field of social work from a college or university school of social work and has engaged in the practice of social work for not less than 2 years. (iii) Have passed an examination approved by the board. (2) In addition to the requirements set forth in this subdivision, subsection (1)(b), a licensed master's social worker employed by a school district shall meet the requirements for employment as a school social worker contained in the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.1 to 380.1852, and the rules promulgated under that act. (3) (2) The board may grant a limited license to engage in the 2-year postdegree experience required under subsection (1) to an individual who has completed all the educational requirements for licensure as a bachelor's social worker or a master's social worker. A limited license granted under this subsection is renewable for not more than 6 years.9 times. Sec. 18509a. (1) The department shall waive the examination requirement under section 18509(1)(a) or (b) for an applicant who meets all of the following requirements: (a) The applicant has taken but has not successfully passed the examination required under this part for licensure as a licensed bachelor's social worker or licensed master's social worker. (b) In addition to completing the postdegree experience required under section 18509(1)(a) or (b), as applicable, the applicant has completed not fewer than 2,000 hours of additional postdegree experience in the practice of social work at the bachelor's level or practice of social work at the master's level, as applicable, under the supervision of a licensed master's social worker. The postdegree experience required under this subdivision must be completed within the time frame in which the individual holds a limited license under section 18509(3). The department shall credit toward the hours required under this subsection any postdegree experience completed by an individual before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section if the postdegree experience otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection. (2) An individual seeking a waiver under this section shall apply to the department on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. (3) Not later than 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Promulgate any rules necessary to implement this section, including, but not limited to, requirements for documenting the postdegree experience required under subsection (1). (b) Post in an area accessible to the public on its website the application for a waiver under this section and the requirements to receive a waiver.